Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1115
Department of Administrative Services; budget division; budgetary planning; duties; responsibilities.

The budget division shall undertake such tasks of budgetary planning as are presently done by various departments and agencies of state government under the current biennial system of appropriations, and shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(1) Coordinate the fiscal plans of all state agencies;

(2) Develop a long-range framework for program budgeting based on forecasts of revenue and expenditures and review all such forecasts of revenue and expenditures quarterly;

(3) Compile and publish annually a summary of the operations and trends under all federal programs in which state agencies have participated or might participate and report on the size and desirability of federal grants and the effectiveness of changes and tax laws on the ability of the state to attract industry; and

(4) Make periodic studies of the policies of other states regarding the levels of services being provided by state agencies in this state in comparison with that of other states.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 15, p. 1701;

Laws 1969, c. 804, § 9, p. 3038.